Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1115
Permitholder, defined.

Permitholder shall mean the owner or operator of land who applies or authorizes the application of chemicals to such land by means of chemigation. The permitholder shall be the party primarily responsible for any liability arising from chemigation on the property.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 15.